California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(d) The draft State Highway System Management Plan shall be submitted to the commission for review and comments not later than February 15 of each odd-numbered year, and the final plan shall be transmitted by the department to the Governor and the Legislature not later than June 1 of each odd-numbered year. The department shall make the draft of its proposed plan available to regional transportation agencies for review and comment, and shall include and respond to the comments in the final plan.

(e) The State Highway System Management Plan shall be the basis for the department’s budget request and for the adoption of fund estimates pursuant to Section
 163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 630, Sec. 6.   (SB 960)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

164.10.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 1.

Route 2, between the north urban limits of Los Angeles-Long Beach and Route 138.

Route 4, between the east urban limits of Antioch-Pittsburg and Route 89.

Route 5.

Route 6.

Route 7.

Route 8.

Route 9, between the north urban limits of Santa Cruz and the south urban limits of San Jose.

Route 10, between the east urban limits of San Bernardino-Riverside and the Arizona state line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 36.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

164.11.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 12.

Route 14.

Route 15.

Route 16, between the east urban limits of Sacramento and Route 49.

Route 17, between the north urban limits of Santa Cruz and the south urban limits of San Jose.

Route 18, between the City of San Bernardino and the junction with Routes 18 and 138 in Los Angeles County.

Route 20.

Route 25, between Route 146 in San Benito County and Route 101 in Santa Clara County.

Route 28.

Route 29.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

164.12.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 36, between Route 5 and Route 395.

Route 37, between the east urban limits of San Francisco-Oakland near Novato and the west urban limits of San Francisco-Oakland near Vallejo.

Route 38, between the east urban limits of San Bernardino-Riverside and Route 18 west of Big Bear Lake.

Route 40.

Route 41, between Route 1 and Yosemite National Park.

Route 44, between the east urban limits of Redding and Route 36.

Route 46, between Route 1 and Route 99.

Route 49, between Route 41 and Route 89.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 38.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

164.13.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 50.

Route 53.

Route 58, between Route 5 and Route 15.

Route 62.

Route 63, between the north urban limits of Visalia and Route 180.

Route 65, between the north urban limits of Bakersfield and Route 198 near Exeter, and between Route 80 and Route 99 near Yuba City.

Route 68.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 39.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

164.14.

For purposes of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include the following:

Route 70, between Route 99 north of Sacramento and Route 395.

Route 74.

Route 78.

Route 79, between Route 8 and Route 10.

Route 80.

Route 84, between Route 580 and Route 4.

Route 86, between Route 111 in Brawley and Route 10.

Route 88.

Route 89.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 598, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

164.15.

For purposes of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 94, except within the urban limits of the County of San Diego.

Route 95, between Route 10 and the Nevada state line.

Route 97.

Route 98, between Route 111 and Route 7.

Route 99, with routing to be determined via Route 70 or via Route 99 between Route 70 north of Sacramento and Route 149 north of Oroville.

Route 101.

Route 108, from Route 132 in Modesto to Route 120 east of Oakdale, and between Route
 120 at Yosemite Junction and Route 395.

Route 111, between the Mexico border near Calexico and Route 10 near Whitewater.

Route 113, between Route 80 and Route 5.

Route 116, between Route 1 and Route 12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   (SB 532)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

164.16.

For purposes of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 120, between Route 5 and Route 395.

Route 126, between the east urban limits of Oxnard-Ventura-Thousand Oaks and Route 5.

Route 127.

Route 128.

Route 129, between Route 1 and Route 101.

Route 132, west of Route 99, and between Route 99 and Route 108.

Route 138, between Route 5 and Route 14 in Los Angeles County and between Route 14 in Los Angeles County and Route 18 near Crestline in San Bernardino
 County.

Route 139, between Route 299 and the Oregon state line.

Route 246, between Route 1 and Route 101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   (SB 532)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

164.17.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 140, between the east urban limits of Merced and Yosemite National Park.

Route 146.

Route 149.

Route 152, between Route 101 and Route 99.

Route 154.

Route 156, between Route 1 and Route 152.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

164.18.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 160, between the north urban limits of Antioch-Pittsburg and the south urban limits of Sacramento.

Route 168, between the east urban limits of Fresno and Route 168 at Florence Lake Road, and between Route 168 near Lake Sabrina and Route 395.

Route 178, between the east urban limits of Bakersfield and Route 14.

Route 180, between the east urban limits of Fresno and Kings Canyon National Park.

Route 188.

Route 190, between Route 65 and Route 127.

Route 198, between Route 5 and the Sequoia National Park.

Route 199.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

164.19.

For purposes of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include the following:

Route 203.

Route 205.

Route 207.

Route 215.

Route 239.

Route 243.

Route 267.

Route 299, between Route 101 and Route 89, and between Route 139 and Route 395.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 598, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

164.20.

For purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 164.3, the eligible interregional and intercounty routes include all of the following:

Route 330, between the north urban limits of San Bernardino-Riverside and Route 18.

Route 371.

Route 395.

Route 505.

Route 580.

Route 680.

Route 905, except within the urban limits of San Diego.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 105, Sec. 57.   Effective July 10, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

164.53.

(a) A local agency may request authorization from the commission to make advance expenditures of funds, other than state or federal funds, for a project which is included in the priority list for the allocation of transit capital improvement funds pursuant to Section 99317 of the Public Utilities Code, or is included in the adopted state transportation improvement program, or is specifically authorized by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620) of Part 11.5 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) If the commission approves a request submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), the approved advance expenditures shall be considered either part of the nonfederal share of project costs, or part of the match from public or
 private sources, for projects which are included in the transit capital improvement program pursuant to Section 99317 of the Public Utilities Code, or included in the state transportation improvement program, or which are authorized by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 99620) of Part 11.5 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) The commission’s approval of a request pursuant to subdivision (b) does not, in and of itself, constitute an obligation to allocate state funds for the project.

(d) The commission, in consultation with the department and local transportation officials, shall develop and adopt guidelines to implement this section. The guidelines shall include a requirement that the advance expenditure of funds will result in the completion of an operable segment of a transportation project. The acquisition of right-of-way needed either for a usable urban or
 commuter rail project or an operable segment of an urban or commuter rail project meets that requirement.

(e) The commission shall prepare a report on the progress and impact of the advance expenditure program authorized by this section and shall include the report as an element of the annual report to the Legislature required pursuant to Sections 14535 and 14536 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 175.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

164.56.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to allocate seven million dollars ($7,000,000) annually to the Environmental Enhancement and Mitigation Program Fund, which is hereby created.

(b) Local, state, and federal agencies and nonprofit entities may apply for and may receive grants, not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) for any single grant, to undertake environmental enhancement and mitigation projects that are directly or indirectly related to the environmental impact of modifying existing transportation facilities or for the design, construction, or expansion of new transportation facilities.

(c) Projects eligible for funding include, but are not
 limited to, all of the following:

(1) Urban forestry projects designed to offset vehicular emissions of carbon dioxide.

(2) Acquisition or enhancement of resource lands to mitigate the loss of, or the detriment to, resource lands lying within the right-of-way acquired for proposed transportation improvements.

(3) Projects to mitigate the impact of proposed transportation facilities or to enhance the environment, where the ability to effectuate the mitigation or enhancement measures is beyond the scope of the lead agency responsible for assessing the environmental impact of the proposed transportation improvement.

(d) Grant proposals shall be submitted to the Resources Agency for evaluation in accordance with procedures and criteria prescribed by the
 Resources Agency. The Resources Agency shall evaluate proposals submitted to it and prepare a list of proposals recommended for funding. The list may be revised at any time. Prior to including a proposal on the list, the Resources Agency shall make a finding that the proposal is eligible for funding pursuant to subdivision (f).

(e) Within the fiscal limitations of subdivisions (a) and (b), the commission shall annually award grants to fund proposals that are included on the list prepared by the Resources Agency pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) Projects funded pursuant to this section shall be projects that contribute to mitigation of the environmental effects of transportation facilities, as provided for by Section 1 of Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   (SB 99)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Transportation Budget [165. - 171.]

165.

The department shall prepare and submit to the Governor a proposed budget. The department shall include, within the proposed budget, the portion of that budget that is to be funded from the State Highway Account.

The department shall inform the commission of all pertinent assumptions and policy directions it intends to use in preparing the budget. This information shall be forwarded to the commission as soon as available. The commission shall review the assumptions and policy directions used in preparing the budget and forward its comments and recommendations to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

166.

The portion of the proposed budget to be funded from the State Highway Account shall be included in the printed fiscal year budget submitted to the Legislature. The degree of detail contained in the portion of the proposed budget shall be established jointly by the Department of Transportation and the Department of Finance. That portion of the proposed budget shall be, for the State Highway Account, the complete and detailed budget as required by Section 13320 of the Government Code. In case of inconsistency between that section and this article, the provisions of this article shall control.

Notwithstanding Section 13321 of the Government Code, the Department of Transportation, in administering the budget of the State Highway Account, shall be responsible for determining the expenditures or incurrence of obligations by quarter or other period of the fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

166.5.

In order to support its proposed budgets and to improve its program management, the Department of Transportation shall develop budgeting, accounting, fiscal control, and management information systems to provide at least the following information:

(a) Documentation and control of positions and personnel services expenditures.

(b) Accounting and reporting of revenues and expenditures on a basis generally consistent with provisions of the Government Code.

These systems shall be developed to better inform the Legislature so that responsible legislative oversight of the program and budget of the Department of Transportation would be possible. These systems shall recognize the special characteristics of the department’s program.

Development of these systems shall be closely coordinated with the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Committees on Transportation of the Senate and Assembly, the Subcommittee on General Government and Transportation of the Senate Committee on Finance, and the Subcommittee on Resources and Transportation of the Assembly Committee on Ways and Means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

167.

(a) Funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund shall be programmed, budgeted subject to Section 163, and expended to maximize the use of federal funds and shall be based on the following sequence of priorities:

(1) Operation, maintenance, and rehabilitation of the state highway system.

(2) Safety improvements where physical changes, other than adding additional lanes, would reduce fatalities and the number and severity of injuries.

(3) Transportation capital improvements that expand capacity or reduce congestion, or do both.

(4) Environmental enhancement and mitigation programs.

(b) With respect to the funds in the State Highway Account, in the Public Transportation Account, and in the Passenger Rail Bond Fund, the proposed budget shall be organized on a program basis. The proposed budget shall list the proposed expenditures for the transportation program under the following program elements:

(1) Administration.

(2) Program development.

(3) Maintenance.

(4) State highway operation and protection.

(5) Local assistance.

(6) Interregional improvements.

(7) Regional improvements.

(8) Environmental enhancement and mitigation programs.

(c) State operations expenditure amounts of the department for interregional and regional transportation improvement projects shall be listed as required by subdivision (b) of Section 14529 of the Government Code, but those amounts other than those for the acquisition of rights-of-way, construction, and construction support shall not be subject to allocation by the commission.

(d) To align the annual budget with the adopted state transportation improvement
 program, the department may submit to the Department of Finance revised capital outlay support and capital outlay budget estimates as part of its May Revision process. Budget proposals related to these changes shall be provided to the Legislature no later than May 1.

(e) The budget shall not include specific appropriations for specific transportation improvement projects, and the Legislature shall not enact legislation containing specific individual transportation projects.

(f) The basis for defining major and minor capital outlay projects shall be established by the commission.

(g) The Legislative Analyst shall prepare an analysis of the proposed expenditures for each program element as a part of the budget
 analysis.

(h) The department shall submit to the Legislative Analyst, and the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review and the Assembly Committee on Budget, on an annual basis, supplemental information to substantiate the department’s proposed capital outlay support budget. The information shall be provided no later than May 1 of each year, and may be provided at an earlier date. The information shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A list of projects for which the department will perform capital outlay support work in the budget year. For each project, the department shall include:

(A) The planned project support budget for support of environmental, design, right-of-way, and construction phases.

(B) The planned capital costs, including construction capital costs and right-of-way capital costs.

(C) The estimated or actual construction start date and completion date.

(D) The name and year of the state transportation program in which the project is programmed, if applicable.

(E) Total prior fiscal year expenditures for capital outlay support.

(F) The number of full-time equivalent positions requested to perform support of environmental, design, right-of-way, and construction work in the fiscal year of the budget request.

(G) Milestones of
 project work by phases that are planned to be completed in the fiscal year of the budget request.

(H) The ratio of support to capital costs based on current programming.

(2) The capital-to-support ratio for all projects completed in the prior fiscal year in each program in each district.

(3) The current total number of authorized and vacant positions in the capital outlay support program in headquarters and in each district.

(4) A five-year projection of the department’s staffing needs to support the state’s transportation capital programs and any workload performed by the department related to federal or local funding for highway capital projects.

(5) The average cost of a personnel-year equivalent in each district based on the department’s existing contracts for capital outlay support work performed by a private company under contract with the department. For each average cost, the department shall provide a description of what factors are included in that cost.

(6) The average cost of a state staff personnel-year in the capital outlay support program in each district and in headquarters. The cost shall include the salary and wages, benefits, program overhead, administrative overhead, and other associated costs. The department shall provide a description of each component of the average cost.

(7) A summary of expected capital outlay support workload for the
 budget year that includes the following:

(A) The total full-time equivalents requested for each type of the following activities: environmental, design, right-of-way, and construction.

(B) The total full-time equivalents requested for each type of project, including, but not limited to, the state transportation improvement program, the state highway operation and protection program, bond programs, regional and local agency partnership workload, and any other program.

(8) The total number of projects with requested resources, as well as the number of projects in which the department is limited to an oversight role.

(9) The number of milestones scheduled, including environmental,
 design, right-of-way, and construction deliverables, as well as the number of projects expected to begin construction and reach completion.

(10) A summary for the most recently completed fiscal year for the following:

(A) Full-time equivalents and related funding expended, including support of environmental, design, right-of-way, and construction activities.

(B) Approved and filled positions as of the end of the fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 272, Sec. 2.   (SB 1102)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

169.

For the purposes of this code, except as provided in Section 170, the date of the award of a contract and of the commencement of a day-labor project shall be deemed the time when the entire obligation thereunder is incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

170.

Where it is estimated by the department that the work involved in a project to be constructed under the State Contract Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code) will not be completed within a given fiscal year, the department, in the contract specifications, may provide a limitation upon the amounts that will be paid to the contractor during the first or second fiscal years of the construction period. Subject to this limitation, the contracts shall provide for the completion of the work and full payment therefor.

For the purposes of complying with Section 169, the department may include in any proposed budget, and the commission may allocate, at least the amounts with reference to those construction projects as would be payable during the fiscal year, together with all necessary engineering and other charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

170.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13302 of the Government Code, the department may, with respect to any project which will not be completed within a fiscal year, finance the project on a cash basis if the department has sufficient unused bonding authority not earmarked for any other project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 24, Sec. 14.   Effective March 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

171.

Prior to the commencement of each fiscal year, the department may advertise for bids for capital outlay projects anticipated to be budgeted during the fiscal year. However, the department shall not award any contract for any capital outlay project until (1) sufficient funds have been appropriated for such project and (2) the commission has allocated sufficient funds for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.8. Local Bridge Seismic Safety Retrofit [179. - 179.3.]

179.

Effective June 30, 2002, all funds in the Seismic Safety Retrofit Account in the State Transportation Fund are transferred to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund. Any outstanding encumbrances as of June 30, 2002, in the Seismic Safety Retrofit Account shall be paid from the State Highway Account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

179.1.

The department may administer projects for local bridge seismic safety retrofits consistent with the requirements of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2400) of Division 3.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

179.2.

The department may allocate State Highway Account funds in lieu of the local matching requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 2413 to the extent funding for this purpose is included in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

179.3.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Bridge” includes a publicly owned pedestrian bridge and a publicly owned rail transit bridge.

(b) “Retrofit” includes both the structural modification of an existing bridge and the replacement of an existing bridge by a newly constructed bridge meeting seismic safety requirements.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Funds for Highway and Public Mass Transit Guideway Purposes [181. - 208.]

181.

(a) The Transportation Revolving Account in the State Transportation Fund is hereby created. With the approval of the Department of Finance, there shall be transferred to, or deposited in, the account all money appropriated, contributed, or made available from any source, including sources other than state appropriations, for expenditure on work within the powers and duties of the Department of Transportation, including, but not limited to, services, surveys, reports, major and minor construction, maintenance, improvements, and equipment as authorized by the state agency for which such an appropriation is made or, as to funds from sources other than state appropriations, as may be authorized by written agreement between the contributor of such funds
 and the Department of Transportation when approved by the Department of Finance.

(b) Money so transferred or deposited is continuously appropriated for expenditure by the Department of Transportation for the purposes for which appropriated, contributed, or made available without regard to fiscal years and Section 16304 of the Government Code. The Department of Transportation may withdraw from the account for use in work for other public agencies, local, state, or federal, such sums as may be necessary for such work where the money to be paid by such other agencies is not deposited in the account in advance of the work being done.

(c) The Department of Transportation shall file against the account all claims covering expenditures incurred, including expenditures incurred prior to the effective date of the act enacting this section, in connection with services, surveys, reports,
 major and minor construction, maintenance, improvements, and equipment, and the State Controller shall draw his warrant therefor against the account.

(d) The Department of Transportation shall keep a record of all expenditures chargeable against each specific portion of the account, and any unused balance in any portion of the account shall, on approval by the Department of Finance, be withdrawn from the account and transferred to the credit of the appropriation from which it was transferred or, as to funds from other than state appropriations, be paid out or refunded as provided in the agreement relating to the contribution.

(e) The Director of Transportation may authorize the refund of money received or collected by the department in payment of fees, licenses, permits, tolls, or for rentals, property, or services, wherein the license, permit, rental, property, or service cannot
 lawfully be issued, furnished, or transferred to the person making the payment, or in cases where the payment, in whole or in part, represents overpayment or payment in duplicate.

(f) The provisions of this section shall only be operative during those fiscal years in which funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund are appropriated by the Budget Act for such fiscal years.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Controller may use the funds in the Transportation Revolving Account in the State Transportation Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be exempt from paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money
 Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which the money is loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 7.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

182.

The “State Highway Fund” is continued in existence as the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund. Any reference in any law or regulation to the State Highway Fund shall be deemed to refer to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

There shall be transferred to, or deposited in, the State Highway Account all money appropriated, contributed, or made available from any source, including sources other than state appropriations, for expenditure on work within the powers and duties of the department, including, but not limited to, services, investigations, surveys, experiments, reports, right-of-way acquisitions, major and minor construction, maintenance, improvements, and equipment, as authorized
 by the state agency for which such an appropriation is made, or as to funds from sources other than state appropriations, as may be authorized by written agreement between the contributor of such funds and the department.

Money so transferred or deposited is available for expenditure by the department for the purposes for which appropriated, contributed, or made available without regard to fiscal years and Section 16304 of the Government Code. The department may withdraw from the account for use in work for other public agencies, local, state, or federal, such sums as may be necessary for such work where the money to be paid by such other agencies is not deposited in the account in advance of the work being done.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Controller may use the funds in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and
 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be exempt from paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which the money is loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 8.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

182.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement projects described in Section 188.5 shall continue to be governed by the provisions of former Article 4.9 (commencing with Section 180), as added by Chapter 15 of the Statutes of 1994 and subsequently amended, as that article read on January 1, 2005, other than former Section 180.7 relative to repeal. This section shall become inoperative when all toll bridge seismic retrofit and replacement projects described in Section 188.5 are complete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 289.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

182.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the transition to the new programs and procedures established in the bill enacting this section shall be fair and equitable and minimize disruptions in the delivery of projects. With specific reference to the transition from county minimums to county shares for regional improvement, no project should be counted twice, no project that would be counted under either the old or new procedures should escape being counted in the transition, shares should be sufficient to fund projects programmed in the 1996 State Transportation Improvement Program for the same period, no incentive or reward should be provided for delaying a project, and no incentive or reward should be provided for allocating funds to a project earlier than the year in which the funds are needed for the project.

(b) At the end of the fiscal year ending June 30, 1998, the county minimums and county minimum deficits shall be recalculated under the law as it existed prior to the enactment of the bill adding this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 164, there shall be set aside sufficient funding for every project that is included in the 1996 State Transportation Improvement Program. This funding shall be set aside in the fund estimate prior to and in addition to the distribution of funding between programs pursuant to Section 164.

(d) The amount of the cumulative county minimum deficit calculated for any county pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be carried forward as a county share for the 1998 State Transportation Improvement Program, prior to and in addition to the computation of county shares pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 188.8.

(e) The commission shall not allocate funds for any project unless the commission has programmed the state transportation improvement program in a manner that complies with the requirements of Sections 188, 188.8, and 188.11.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for a county within the region defined by Section 66502 of the Government Code where funds were traded in the 1996 State Transportation Improvement Program to another county in that region, the county share for that county for the 1998 State Transportation Improvement Program shall be increased by the amount of the trade in the 1996 State Transportation Improvement Program, as if the share were a county minimum deficit under subdivision (d).

(g) In adopting the 1998 State Transportation Improvement Program, the commission shall, at a minimum, fund all intercity rail projects that are included in the adopted 1996 State Transportation Improvement Program. The amount of funds programmed for each project shall not be less than the amount in the 1996 State Transportation Improvement Program.

(h) The commission, after consulting with the department and the regional planning agencies, shall adopt interim guidelines and procedures relative to fund estimates and project selection in a manner that the first state transportation improvement program, pursuant to the provisions of the act adding this section, is adopted not later than June 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

182.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 182 and 182.5, Sections 188, 188.8, and 825 do not apply to the expenditure of an amount of federal funds equal to the amount of federal funds apportioned to the state pursuant to that portion of Section 104(b)(3), Section 157(a) and (c), and
 Section
 160(d) of Title 23 of the United States Code that is allocated within the state subject to Section 133(d)(3) of that code. These funds shall be known as the regional surface transportation program funds. The department, the transportation planning agencies, the county transportation commissions, and the metropolitan planning organizations may do all things necessary in their jurisdictions to secure and expend those federal funds in accordance with the intent of federal law and this chapter.

(b) The regional surface transportation program funds
 shall be apportioned by the department to the metropolitan planning organizations designated pursuant to Section 134 of Title 23 of the United States Code and, in areas where none has been designated, to the transportation planning agency designated pursuant to Section 29532 of the Government Code. The funds shall be apportioned in the manner and in accordance with the formula set forth in Section 133(d)(3) of Title 23 of the United States Code, except that the apportionment shall be among all areas of the state. Funds apportioned under this subdivision shall remain available for three federal fiscal years, including the federal
 fiscal year apportioned.

(c) (1) Where county transportation commissions have been created by the County Transportation Commissions Act (Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) of the Public Utilities Code), all regional surface transportation program funds shall be further apportioned by the metropolitan planning organization to the county transportation commission on the basis of relative population.

(2) In the Monterey Bay region, all regional surface transportation program funds shall be further apportioned, on the basis of relative population, by the metropolitan planning organization to the regional transportation planning agencies designated under subdivision (b) of Section 29532 of the Government Code.

(d) The applicable metropolitan planning organization, county transportation commission, or transportation planning agency shall annually apportion the regional surface transportation program funds for projects in each county, as follows:

(1) An amount equal to the amount apportioned under the federal-aid urban program in federal fiscal year 1990–91 adjusted for population. The adjustment for population shall be based on the population determined in the 1990 federal census except that no county shall be apportioned less than 110 percent of the apportionment received in the 1990–91 fiscal year. These funds shall be apportioned for projects implemented by cities, counties, and other transportation agencies on a fair and equitable basis based upon an annually updated five-year average
 of allocations.
 Projects shall be nominated by cities, counties, transit operators, and other public transportation agencies through a process that directly involves local government representatives.

(2) An amount not less than 110 percent of the amount that the county was apportioned under the federal-aid secondary program in federal fiscal year 1990–91, for use by that county.

(e) (1) The department shall notify each metropolitan planning organization, county transportation commission, and transportation planning agency receiving an apportionment under this section, as soon as possible each year, of the amount of obligation authority estimated to be available for program purposes.

 (2) The metropolitan